Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 42.06.600.
[Renumbered as AS 42.06.230(b).]

Sec. 42.06.601.
Exemption.

An in-state natural gas pipeline subject to AS 42.08 and an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier subject to AS 42.08 are exempt from this chapter.

History.

(§ 20 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.06.605.
Restrictions on commissioners and employees.

A member or employee of the commission may not have an official connection with, or hold stock or securities in, or have a pecuniary interest in, a corporation, company, or association engaged in the production or the transportation of oil or gas.
A member or employee may not act upon a matter in which the relationship of the member or employee with any person creates a conflict of interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

42.06.130

. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 42.06.607.
Application fees.

The commission may establish reasonable fees to cover the costs of initial processing of applications for certificates or amendments to certificates.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

42.06.520

. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.06.610.
Expenses of investigation or hearing.

During a proceeding held under this chapter, the commission may allocate the cost of the proceeding among the parties, including the commission, as is just under the circumstances. In allocating costs, the commission shall consider the regulatory cost charge paid directly or indirectly under AS

42.06.286

. The costs allocated may include the costs of any time devoted to investigations or hearings by hired consultants, whether or not the consultants appear as witnesses or participants. The commission shall provide an opportunity for any person objecting to an allocation to be heard before the allocation becomes final.

After completion of a proceeding held under this chapter, the commission may reallocate the cost of the proceeding among the parties, including the commission, as is just under the circumstances. The costs which are reallocated may include the costs of time devoted to investigations or hearings by hired consultants, whether or not the consultants appear as witnesses or participants. The commission shall provide an opportunity for any person objecting to a reallocation to be heard before the reallocation becomes final.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Notwithstanding the commission’s discretion under (a) and (b) of this section to allocate costs to parties, the commission may not require a state agency to pay any costs allocated to the state agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 1981; am § 64 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am §§ 25, 26 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 11 ch 1 SLA 1995; am § 13 ch 98 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The word “party” in AS

42.05.651

and in this section, for purposes of allocating the commission’s costs of rulemaking proceedings, should be interpreted in its ordinary legal sense and does not include interested persons who comment in a rulemaking proceeding.
It follows that the commission cannot, in order to allocate costs to a person, make that person a party to a rulemaking proceeding, whether by declaration or by invitation to which the person responds. September 29, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.06.620.
Classification.

The commission may by regulation provide for the classification of oil or gas pipeline facilities based upon differences in annual revenue, assets, nature of ownership, and other appropriate distinctions and as between these classifications, by regulation, provide for different reporting, accounting, and other regulatory requirements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.06.630.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“affiliated interest” means any person or other entity that

is controlled or owned, in whole or in part, by a pipeline carrier;

is controlled or owned, in whole or in part, by an entity which controls or owns, in whole or in part, a pipeline carrier;

is an agent, employee, contractor, or subcontractor of a pipeline carrier or any entity controlled or owned, in whole or in part, by a pipeline carrier; or

controls or owns, in whole or in part, a pipeline carrier;

“capacity” means, with reference to a North Slope natural gas pipeline, the average daily volume throughput of the North Slope natural gas pipeline, calculated at the normal operating pressure of the North Slope natural gas pipeline as set out in the pipeline design;

“commission” means the Regulatory Commission of Alaska (AS

42.04.010

);

“commissioner” means a member of the commission;

“duties” means duties, powers, obligations, and functions;

“firm transportation service” means service by a natural gas pipeline carrier that is not subject to a prior claim by another shipper or another class of service; service constitutes “firm transportation service” if the service receives the same priority as any other class of firm transportation service;

“gas” includes all natural gas and hydrocarbons produced at the wellhead and not defined as oil;

“interruptible transportation service” means service by a natural gas pipeline carrier in which the carrier’s pipeline system capacity may be subject to a prior claim by another shipper or another class of service; a service constitutes “interruptible transportation service” if the service is given a lower priority than another class of service, resulting in noncontinuous service to a shipper of natural gas;

“intrastate,” as applied to the transportation of North Slope natural gas, means the transportation of North Slope natural gas between any point within the state and another point within the state, for ultimate consumption of the North Slope natural gas within the state;

“natural gas pipeline” or “natural gas pipeline facility” means all the facilities of a total system of pipe, whether owned or operated by a natural gas pipeline carrier under a contract, agreement, or lease in this state used by a natural gas pipeline carrier for transportation of natural gas for delivery, storage, or further transportation, and including all pipe, pump and compressor stations, station equipment, and all other facilities used or necessary for an integral line of pipe to effectuate the transportation from point to point, excluding, however, gas processing plants, treaters, and separators;

“natural gas pipeline carrier” means the owner, including a corporation, company, or other entity organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, of a natural gas pipeline, as the term is defined in this section, or an interest in it, or any person, including a corporation, company, or other entity organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, authorized to construct or extend pipeline facilities under this chapter;

“North Slope natural gas” means gas that is produced from the area of Alaska lying north of 68 degrees North latitude and that, but for a pipeline subject to regulation under this chapter, had not been committed for sale and delivery in a commercial market due to the prevailing costs or price conditions;

“North Slope natural gas pipeline” or “North Slope natural gas pipeline facility” means all the facilities of a total system of pipe, whether owned or operated by a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier under a contract, agreement, or lease, in this state used by a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier for transportation of North Slope natural gas for delivery, storage, or further transportation, including all pipe, pump, and compressor stations, station equipment, gas processing plants, treaters, separators, and all other facilities used or necessary for an integral line of pipe to carry out the transportation from point to point, but excluding marine terminal facilities and the integrated plant, facilities, and equipment, including pollution control equipment, used for conditioning, storage, handling, or processing of North Slope natural gas into liquefied natural gas;

“North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier” means the owner, including a corporation, company, or other entity organized under the laws of the United States or of a state, of a North Slope natural gas pipeline, or an interest in it, or a person, including a corporation, company, or other entity, organized under the laws of the United States or of a state, authorized to construct, operate, or extend North Slope natural gas pipeline facilities under this chapter;

“oil” includes crude oil, and other hydrocarbons regardless of gravity that are produced at the wellhead in liquid form, its products and liquid hydrocarbons, including the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas, other than gas produced in association with oil and commonly known as casinghead gas;

“pipeline” or “pipeline facility” means all the facilities of a total system of pipe, whether owned or operated by a pipeline carrier under a contract, agreement, or lease, in this state used by a pipeline carrier for transportation, for hire and as a common carrier, of oil, gas, coal, or other mineral slurry for delivery, storage, or further transportation, and including all pipe, pump and compressor stations, station equipment, and all other facilities used or necessary for an integral line of pipe to effectuate the transportation from point to point, excluding, however, gas processing plants, treaters, and separators;

“pipeline carrier” means the owner, including corporations organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, of any pipeline, as the term is defined in this section, or any interest in it, or any person, including corporations organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, authorized to construct or extend pipeline facilities under AS

42.06.240(a)

;

“regulation” includes rules;

“tariff” means a rate, charge, toll, rule, or regulation of an oil or gas pipeline facility relating to services furnished by the facility to the general public or other users for compensation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am §§ 7, 8 ch 6 FSSLA 1973; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 35 SLA 1977; am §§ 14, 15, 20 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 19 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 8 ch 56 SLA 2000; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 60 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1983, 1998, and 2000 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Paragraphs (10) and (11) were enacted as (18) and (19). Renumbered in 2003, at which time paragraphs (10) — (17) were renumbered as (12) — (19).

Sec. 42.06.640.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Pipeline Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 16 ch 110 SLA 1981)